Utah statutes.
53A-11-1302.   Reporting of prohibited acts affecting a school -- Confidentiality.

(1)  A person who has reasonable cause to believe that an individual has committed a prohibited act shall immediately notify:

(a)  the nearest law enforcement agency;

(b)  the principal;

(c)  an administrator of the affected school;

(d)  the superintendent of the affected school district; or

(e)  an administrator of the affected school district.

(2)  If notice is given to a school official, the official may authorize an investigation into allegations involving school property, students, or school district employees.

(3)  School officials may refer a complaint of an alleged prohibited act reported as occurring on school grounds or in connection with school-sponsored activities to an appropriate law enforcement agency.  Referrals shall be made by school officials if the complaint alleges the prohibited act occurred elsewhere.

(4)  The identity of persons making reports pursuant to this section shall be kept confidential.

